Tennessee, session 114, SB1525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (31).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 29, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
4-29-255.
(a) The following governmental entities terminate on June 30, 2034:
( ) Interstate Compact for Supervision of Adult Offenders, created by §
40-28-401;
(b) Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state
government created during calendar year 2032 terminates on June 30, 2034.
(c) Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be
continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1525
010083
- 1 -